tests/agglut_nsk.aff
# Test data based on a small sample of Naskapi words

SET ISO8859-1

AGGLUTINATIVE 3 2


PFX R Y 1
PFX R        mi      maa      miy

PFX Y Y 1
PFX Y        w       wiy      w

PFX N Y 1
PFX N        0       naa      n

PFX H Y 1
PFX H        0       ni       n

PFX Q Y 1
PFX Q        ni      naa      ni

PFX K Y 1
PFX K        0       ki/A     .

PFX A Y 1
PFX A        0       ati      .

# future
PFX F Y 1
PFX F        0       chaa     .

PFX D Y 1
PFX D        0       chii/C   .

PFX C Y 1
PFX C        0       chiki/G  .

# negative marker
PFX G Y 1
PFX G        0       mi       .


# obviative category
SFX B Y 1
SFX B        0       a        .

SFX H Y 1
SFX H        im      aahk     .

SFX T Y 1
SFX T        aaw     aat      .

SFX V Y 1
SFX V        w       tin      w

SFX Z Y 1
SFX Z        0       aan      .
