tests/agglut_nsk.good
asiniya
wiyaapaahtaahk
chaamiywaayihtimaan
maaywaayihtimaan
nituwaahtaaw
naanituwaahtaat
ninituwaahtaaw
naatuwaahtaat
atikichiihtisimaat
michikichiipitiskaatin
pistiskaaw
michikichiipistiskaatin
