tests/agglut_nsk.wrong
atichiihtisimaat
chikichaapistiskaaw
michikichipitiskaatin
waapaahtimaan
chiichikipistiskaatin
chikimichiipitiskaatin
asiniyaan
michiipitiskaatin
xxxmichikichiipistiskaatin
